test/src/gt-norm-yamls/sje-tests-list_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
    
  Noun - albme: # Even syll
    albme+N+Sg+Gen: alme

  Noun - almatj: # Even syll
    almatj+N+Sg+Gen: almatja

  Noun - asske: # Even syll
    asske+N+Sg+Gen: aske

  Noun - bäbbmo: # Even syll
    bäbbmo+N+Sg+Gen: biebmo

  Noun - bähkke: # Even syll
    bähkke+N+Sg+Gen: biehke

  Noun - bähtse: # Even syll
    bähtse+N+Sg+Gen: bietse

  Noun - bielle: # Even syll
    bielle+N+Sg+Gen: biele

  Noun - biena: # Even syll
    biena+N+Sg+Gen: biednaga

  Noun - biesse: # Even syll
    biesse+N+Sg+Gen: biese

  Noun - bävvla: # Even syll
    bävvla+N+Sg+Gen: bievla

  Noun - bijjla: # Even syll
    bijjla+N+Sg+Gen: bijla

  Noun - bijjpa: # Even syll
    bijjpa+N+Sg+Gen: bijpa

  Noun - billga: # Even syll
    billga+N+Sg+Gen: bilga

  Noun - binna: # Even syll
    binna+N+Sg+Gen: binna

  Noun - buallva: # Even syll
    buallva+N+Sg+Gen: buolva

  Noun - buvdna: # Even syll
    buvdna+N+Sg+Gen: buvna

  Noun - buvtsomällke: # Even syll
    buvtsomällke+N+Sg+Gen: buvtsomielke

  Noun - báhko: # Even syll
    báhko+N+Sg+Gen: bágo

  Noun - bákkte: # Even syll
    bákkte+N+Sg+Gen: bákte

  Noun - bálle: # Even syll
    bálle+N+Sg+Gen: bále

  Noun - bállka: # Even syll
    bállka+N+Sg+Gen: bálka

  Noun - bárdne: # Even syll
    bárdne+N+Sg+Gen: bárne

  Noun - bássma: # Even syll
    bássma+N+Sg+Gen: básma

  Noun - bäbbmo: # Even syll
    bäbbmo+N+Sg+Gen: biebmo

  Noun - bäbmo: # Even syll
    bäbmo+N+Sg+Gen: biebmo

  Noun - bäjjve: # Even syll
    bäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: biejve

  Noun - bäjssko: # Even syll
    bäjssko+N+Sg+Gen: biejsko

  Noun - bälle: # Even syll
    bälle+N+Sg+Gen: biele

  Noun - bärdna: # Even syll
    bärdna+N+Sg+Gen: bierna

  Noun - bässe: # Even syll
    bässe+N+Sg+Gen: biese

  Noun - bävvla: # Even syll
    bävvla+N+Sg+Gen: bievla

  Noun - bäŋŋka: # Even syll
    bäŋŋka+N+Sg+Gen: bäŋka

  Noun - båddne: # Even syll
    båddne+N+Sg+Gen: bådne

  Noun - båddnje: # Even syll
    båddnje+N+Sg+Gen: bådnje


  Noun - båjjtjå: # Even syll
    båjjtjå+N+Sg+Gen: båjtjå

  Noun - båldne: # Even syll
    båldne+N+Sg+Gen: bålne

  Noun - bålldne: # Even syll
    bålldne+N+Sg+Gen: båldne

  Noun - bånnda: # Even syll
    bånnda+N+Sg+Gen: bånda

  Noun - bånndá: # Even syll
    bånndá+N+Sg+Gen: båndá

  Noun - båssjo: # Even syll
    båssjo+N+Sg+Gen: båssjo

  Noun - båtsojjåhtejsábme: # Even syll
    båtsojjåhtejsábme+N+Sg+Gen: båtsojjåhtejsáme

  Noun - båtsojlahkke: # Even syll
    båtsojlahkke+N+Sg+Gen: båtsojlahke

  Noun - båttkå: # Even syll
    båttkå+N+Sg+Gen: båtkå

  Noun - didnadäddje: # Even syll
    didnadäddje+N+Sg+Gen: didnadäddje

  Noun - didnadäjje: # Even syll
    didnadäjje+N+Sg+Gen: didnadäjje

  Noun - dimbar: # Even syll
    dimbar+N+Sg+Gen: dimbara

  Noun - duädde: # Even syll
    duädde+N+Sg+Gen: duädde

  Noun - dábbde: # Even syll
    dábbde+N+Sg+Gen: dábde

  Noun - dáffo: # Even syll
    dáffo+N+Sg+Gen: dáfo

  Noun - dállve: # Even syll
    dállve+N+Sg+Gen: dálve

  Noun - dámmba: # Even syll
    dámmba+N+Sg+Gen: dámba

  Noun - dámmpa: # Even syll
    dámmpa+N+Sg+Gen: dámpa

  Noun - dåbbmobäjjve: # Even syll
    dåbbmobäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: dåbbmobiejve

  Noun - dållå: # Even syll
    dållå+N+Sg+Gen: dålå

  Noun - fiello: # Even syll
    fiello+N+Sg+Gen: fielo

  Noun - fuällke: # Even syll
    fuällke+N+Sg+Gen: fuolke

  Noun - fáhttsa: # Even syll
    fáhttsa+N+Sg+Gen: fáhtsa

  Noun - fálffo: # Even syll
    fálffo+N+Sg+Gen: fálfo

  Noun - fáttme: # Even syll
    fáttme+N+Sg+Gen: fátme

  Noun - fáŋŋga: # Even syll
    fáŋŋga+N+Sg+Gen: fáŋga

  Noun - fällo: # Even syll
    fällo+N+Sg+Gen: fiello

  Noun - fävvsa: # Even syll
    fävvsa+N+Sg+Gen: fievsa

  Noun - fävvse: # Even syll
    fävvse+N+Sg+Gen: fievse

  Noun - gabnnja: # Even syll
    gabnnja+N+Sg+Gen: gabnja

  Noun - gadtsa: # Even syll
    gadtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gadtsa

  Noun - gahper: # Even syll
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen: gahpera

  Noun - gajtsamällke: # Even syll
    gajtsamällke+N+Sg+Gen: gajtsamielke

  Noun - gappte: # Even syll
    gappte+N+Sg+Gen: gapte

  Noun - gasskaijja: # Even syll
    gasskaijja+N+Sg+Gen: gasskaija

  Noun - gidda: # Even syll
    gidda+N+Sg+Gen: gida

  Noun - gidá: # Even syll
    gidá+N+Sg+Gen: gidá

  Noun - gäbdne: # Even syll
    gäbdne+N+Sg+Gen: giebne

  Noun - giehta: # Even syll
    giehta+N+Sg+Gen: gieda

  Noun - giehtje: # Even syll
    giehtje+N+Sg+Gen: gietje

  Noun - giesse: # Even syll
    giesse+N+Sg+Gen: giese

  Noun - giessebäjjve: # Even syll
    giessebäjjve+N+Sg+Gen: giessebiejve

  Noun - gimmsja: # Even syll
    gimmsja+N+Sg+Gen: gimsja

  Noun - gintal: # Even syll
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen: ginntala

  Noun - girrje: # Even syll
    girrje+N+Sg+Gen: girje

  Noun - girrko: # Even syll
    girrko+N+Sg+Gen: girko

  Noun - gissta: # Even syll
    gissta+N+Sg+Gen: gista

  Noun - giđđa: # Even syll
    giđđa+N+Sg+Gen: giđa

  Noun - grássebáhkko: # Even syll
    grássebáhkko+N+Sg+Gen: grássebáhkko

  Noun - guabbla: # Even syll
    guabbla+N+Sg+Gen: guobla

  Noun - guarrba: # Even syll
    guarrba+N+Sg+Gen: guorba

  Noun - guäkkte: # Even syll
    guäkkte+N+Sg+Gen: guokte

  Noun - gummo: # Even syll
    gummo+N+Sg+Gen: gummo

  Noun - gummpi: # Even syll
    gummpi+N+Sg+Gen: gumpi

  Noun - guabbla: # Even syll
    guabbla+N+Sg+Gen: guobla

  Noun - guällbe: # Even syll
    guällbe+N+Sg+Gen: guolbe

  Noun - guolle: # Even syll
    guolle+N+Sg+Gen: guole

  Noun - guosmak: # Even syll
    guosmak+N+Sg+Gen: guosmaga

  Noun - gurbmá: # Even syll
    gurbmá+N+Sg+Gen: gurmá

  Noun - gurmmá: # Even syll
    gurmmá+N+Sg+Gen: gurmá

  Noun - gurrte: # Even syll
    gurrte+N+Sg+Gen: gurte

  Noun - gusamällke: # Even syll
    gusamällke+N+Sg+Gen: gusamielke

  Noun - gussa: # Even syll
    gussa+N+Sg+Gen: gusa
  Noun - gájjse: # Even syll
    gájjse+N+Sg+Gen: gájse

  Noun - gájjtsa: # Even syll
    gájjtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gájtsa

  Noun - gámmsa: # Even syll
    gámmsa+N+Sg+Gen: gámsa

  Noun - gárrde: # Even syll
    gárrde+N+Sg+Gen: gárde

  Noun - gárrtsa: # Even syll
    gárrtsa+N+Sg+Gen: gártsa

  Noun - gäbdne: # Even syll
    gäbdne+N+Sg+Gen: giebne

  Noun - gädde: # Even syll
    gädde+N+Sg+Gen: giedde

  Noun - gähtto: # Even syll
    gähtto+N+Sg+Gen: giehto

  Noun - gäjdno: # Even syll
    gäjdno+N+Sg+Gen: giejno

  Noun - gärrge: # Even syll
    gärrge+N+Sg+Gen: gierge

  Noun - gärrgelahpa: # Even syll
    gärrgelahpa+N+Sg+Gen: gärrgelaba

  Noun - gättke: # Even syll
    gättke+N+Sg+Gen: gietke

  Noun - gåhte: # Even syll
    gåhte+N+Sg+Gen: gåde

  Noun - gålbmå: # Even syll
    gålbmå+N+Sg+Gen: gålmå

  Noun - gållse: # Even syll
    gållse+N+Sg+Gen: gålse

  Noun - gårdne: # Even syll
    gårdne+N+Sg+Gen: gårdne

  Noun - gårnne: # Even syll
    gårnne+N+Sg+Gen: gårne

  Noun - gårrså: # Even syll
    gårrså+N+Sg+Gen: gårså

  Noun - gårrtje: # Even syll
    gårrtje+N+Sg+Gen: gårtje

  Noun - gåvdnje: # Even syll
    gåvdnje+N+Sg+Gen: gåvnje

  Noun - happsa: # Even syll
    happsa+N+Sg+Gen: hapsa

  Noun - huvvsa: # Even syll
    huvvsa+N+Sg+Gen: huvsa

  Noun - hábres: # Even syll
    hábres+N+Sg+Gen: hábrrá

  Noun - hägga: # Even syll
    hägga+N+Sg+Gen: hiegga

  Noun - hälbme: # Even syll
    hälbme+N+Sg+Gen: hielme

 
  Noun - härrge: # Even syll
    härrge+N+Sg+Gen: hierge

  Noun - härrá: # Even syll
    härrá+N+Sg+Gen: härrá

  Noun - idja: # Even syll
    idja+N+Sg+Gen: ija

  Noun - iello: # Even syll
    iello+N+Sg+Gen: ielo

  Noun - ijja: # Even syll
    ijja+N+Sg+Gen: ija

  Noun - jahke: # Even syll
    jahke+N+Sg+Gen: jage

  Noun - jiegŋa: # Even syll
    jiegŋa+N+Sg+Gen: jieŋa

  Noun - juovva: # Even syll
    juovva+N+Sg+Gen: juova

  Noun - juällke: # Even syll
    juällke+N+Sg+Gen: juolke

  Noun - jávvre: # Even syll
    jávvre+N+Sg+Gen: jávre

  Noun - jávvrelådde: # Even syll
    jávvrelådde+N+Sg+Gen: jávvrelådde

  Noun - jåhkå: # Even syll
    jåhkå+N+Sg+Gen: jågå

  Noun - jåhkågádde: # Even syll
    jåhkågádde+N+Sg+Gen: jåhkågádde

  Noun - jårrbodahka: # Even syll
    jårrbodahka+N+Sg+Gen: jårrbodaga

  Noun - kaffa: # Even syll
    kaffa+N+Sg+Gen: kaffa

  Noun - kammba: # Even syll
    kammba+N+Sg+Gen: kamba

  Noun - klåhkkár: # Even syll
    klåhkkár+N+Sg+Gen: klåhkkára

  Noun - kujdna: # Even syll
    kujdna+N+Sg+Gen: kujna

  Noun - káffa: # Even syll
    káffa+N+Sg+Gen: káffa

  Noun - kånnsta: # Even syll
    kånnsta+N+Sg+Gen: kånsta

  Noun - lassta: # Even syll
    lassta+N+Sg+Gen: lasta

  Noun - liddja: # Even syll
    liddja+N+Sg+Gen: lidja

  Noun - lihtte: # Even syll
    lihtte+N+Sg+Gen: lihte

  Noun - livva: # Even syll
    livva+N+Sg+Gen: liva

  Noun - luadda: # Even syll
    luadda+N+Sg+Gen: luodda

  Noun - luakkta: # Even syll
    luakkta+N+Sg+Gen: luokta

  Noun - låhpe: # Even syll
    låhpe+N+Sg+Gen: låbe

  Noun - luadda: # Even syll
    luadda+N+Sg+Gen: luodda

  Noun - luovve: # Even syll
    luovve+N+Sg+Gen: luove

  Noun - lusspe: # Even syll
    lusspe+N+Sg+Gen: luspe

  Noun - luäppte: # Even syll
    luäppte+N+Sg+Gen: luopte

  Noun - lábbtje: # Even syll
    lábbtje+N+Sg+Gen: lábtje

  Noun - lájjbe: # Even syll
    lájjbe+N+Sg+Gen: lájbe

  Noun - lánnda: # Even syll
    lánnda+N+Sg+Gen: lánda

  Noun - lássta: # Even syll
    lássta+N+Sg+Gen: lásta

  Noun - lávvlomvärrsa: # Even syll
    lávvlomvärrsa+N+Sg+Gen: lávvlomvärrsa

  Noun - länjggá: # Even syll
    länjggá+N+Sg+Gen: länjgá

  Noun - lännska: # Even syll
    lännska+N+Sg+Gen: lännska

  Noun - lådde: # Even syll
    lådde+N+Sg+Gen: lådde

  Noun - lånestäddje: # Even syll
    lånestäddje+N+Sg+Gen: lånestäddje
    
  Noun - lånestäjje: # Even syll
    lånestäjje+N+Sg+Gen: lånestäjje
    
  Noun - låpptå: # Even syll
    låpptå+N+Sg+Gen: låptå

  Noun - mannje: # Even syll
    mannje+N+Sg+Gen: manje

  Noun - muorra: # Even syll
    muorra+N+Sg+Gen: muora

  Noun - muvvra: # Even syll
    muvvra+N+Sg+Gen: muvra

  Noun - máles: # Even syll
    máles+N+Sg+Gen: mállása

  Noun - mánno: # Even syll
    mánno+N+Sg+Gen: máno

  Noun - mánná: # Even syll
    mánná+N+Sg+Gen: máná

  Noun - mánnábálle: # Even syll
    mánnábálle+N+Sg+Gen: mánnábále

  Noun - mällke: # Even syll
    mällke+N+Sg+Gen: mielke

  Noun - måhkke: # Even syll
    måhkke+N+Sg+Gen: måhke

  Noun - mårrse: # Even syll
    mårrse+N+Sg+Gen: mårse

  Noun - namma: # Even syll
    namma+N+Sg+Gen: nama

  Noun - namma: # Even syll
    namma+N+Sg+Gen: namma

  Noun - nieđđa: # Even syll
    nieđđa+N+Sg+Gen: nieđđa

  Noun - nijjbe: # Even syll
    nijjbe+N+Sg+Gen: nijbe

  Noun - njalla: # Even syll
    njalla+N+Sg+Gen: njala

  Noun - njidtje: # Even syll
    njidtje+N+Sg+Gen: njidtje

  Noun - njissjkom: # Even syll
    njissjkom+N+Sg+Gen: njissjkoma

  Noun - nuähtte: # Even syll
    nuähtte+N+Sg+Gen: nuohte

  Noun - náhkke: # Even syll
    náhkke+N+Sg+Gen: náhke

  Noun - náhppe: # Even syll
    náhppe+N+Sg+Gen: náhpe

  Noun - námme: # Even syll
    námme+N+Sg+Gen: náme

  Noun - násste: # Even syll
    násste+N+Sg+Gen: náste 

  Noun - näjjda: # Even syll
    näjjda+N+Sg+Gen: niejda

  Noun - nåjjde: # Even syll
    nåjjde+N+Sg+Gen: nåjde

  Noun - påvvstå: # Even syll
    påvvstå+N+Sg+Gen: påvstå

  Noun - rabbda: # Even syll
    rabbda+N+Sg+Gen: rabda

  Noun - ragátmánno: # Even syll
    ragátmánno+N+Sg+Gen: ragátmáno

  Noun - ragátájjge: # Even syll
    ragátájjge+N+Sg+Gen: ragátájge

  Noun - rassta: # Even syll
    rassta+N+Sg+Gen: rasta

  Noun - rebij: # Even syll
    rebij+N+Sg+Gen: riepeha

  Noun - rämmste: # Even syll
    rämmste+N+Sg+Gen: riemste

  Noun - rijjka: # Even syll
    rijjka+N+Sg+Gen: rijka

  Noun - rimmste: # Even syll
    rimmste+N+Sg+Gen: rimste

  Noun - rissja: # Even syll
    rissja+N+Sg+Gen: risja
